Hawaii statutes.
[§465D-10] Renewal of license.
Licenses issued pursuant to this chapter shall be valid for two years and shall
be renewed upon the payment of a renewal fee within sixty days before the
expiration of the license. Failure to renew a license shall result in
forfeiture of that license. Licenses that have been forfeited may be restored
within one year of the forfeiture date upon payment of renewal and restoration
fees. Failure to restore a forfeited license within one year shall result in
the automatic termination of the license. A person whose license has been
terminated pursuant to this section shall be required to reapply for a new
license as a new applicant. [L 2015, c 199, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next